Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2695YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 559 Section 1. Section 717B.2, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 4. A person who commits animal abuse that causes serious 3 injury or death to an animal is guilty of an aggravated 4 misdemeanor a class âDâ felony . 5 5. Notwithstanding subsection 4 , a person who commits 6 animal abuse that causes serious injury or death to an animal 7 is guilty of a class âDâ felony if the person has previously 8 been convicted of committing animal abuse pursuant to this 9 section , animal neglect punishable as a serious misdemeanor 10 or aggravated misdemeanor pursuant to section 717B.3 , animal 11 torture pursuant to section 717B.3A , injury to or interference 12 with a police service dog pursuant to section 717B.9 , 13 bestiality pursuant to section 717C.1 , or an act involving a 14 contest event prohibited in section 717D.2 . 15 Sec. 2. Section 717B.3, subsections 5 and 6, Code 2025, are 16 amended to read as follows: 17 5. A person who commits animal neglect that causes serious 18 injury or death to an animal is guilty of an aggravated 19 misdemeanor a class âDâ felony . 20 6. Notwithstanding subsection 5 , a person who commits 21 animal neglect that causes serious injury or death to an 22 animal is guilty of a class âDâ felony if the person has been 23 previously convicted of animal abuse pursuant to section 24 717B.2 , animal neglect punishable as a serious misdemeanor or 25 aggravated misdemeanor pursuant to this section , animal torture 26 pursuant to section 717B.3A , injury to or interference with 27 a police service dog pursuant to section 717B.9 , bestiality 28 pursuant to section 717C.1 , or an act involving a contest event 29 prohibited in section 717D.2 . 30 Sec. 3. Section 717B.3A, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, are 31 amended to read as follows: 32 4. A person who commits animal torture is guilty of an 33 aggravated misdemeanor a class âDâ felony . 34 5. Notwithstanding subsection 4 , a person who commits 35 -1- LSB 2695YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 559 animal torture is guilty of a class âDâ felony if the person 1 has previously been convicted of committing animal abuse 2 pursuant to section 717B.2 , animal neglect punishable as a 3 serious misdemeanor or aggravated misdemeanor pursuant to 4 section 717B.3 , animal torture pursuant to this section , injury 5 to or interference with a police service dog pursuant to 6 section 717B.9 , bestiality pursuant to section 717C.1 , or an 7 act involving a contest event prohibited in section 717D.2 . 8